Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1049.
Forfeitures and seizures generally; property subject to forfeiture.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

All controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed or acquired in violation of this act;

All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substances in violation of this act;

All property which is used as a container for property described in paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection;

All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data, which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this act;

All conveyances including aircraft, vehicles or vessels, knowingly used or intended for use to transport or in any manner to knowingly facilitate the transportation for the sale or receipt of property described in paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection may be seized by the commissioner and forfeited to the state pursuant to subsection (e) of this section:

No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or corporate officer is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this act;

No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act committed without the knowledge or consent of the owner;

A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture for a violation of W.S. 35-7-1031(c);

A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act.

All “drug paraphernalia” as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xxvii);

All buildings knowingly used or intended for use to store, manufacture or distribute property described under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection if the owner has knowledge of or gives consent to the act of violation. A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he did not have knowledge of or give consent to the act;

Any property or other thing of pecuniary value furnished in exchange for a controlled substance in violation of this act including any proceeds, assets or other property of any kind traceable to the exchange and any money, securities or other negotiable instruments used to facilitate a violation of this act. Property used or furnished without the consent or knowledge of the owner is not forfeitable under this section to the extent of his interest.

Property subject to forfeiture under this act may be seized by any law enforcement officer of the state upon process issued by any district court or district court commissioner having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal, injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this act;

The board or commissioner has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this act. Prior to property being seized by any law enforcement officer of the state pursuant to this paragraph, the following procedures shall be followed:

The law enforcement officer shall communicate with the commissioner regarding the facts and circumstances involving the property to be seized. Based upon the information provided, the commissioner shall determine whether probable cause exists that the property identified by the law enforcement officer was used or was intended to be used in a violation of this act;

If the commissioner determines there is probable cause to seize the property, he shall direct the officer to seize the property. At the time of the seizure, the person or persons from whom the property was seized shall be given written notice that the seized property is subject to forfeiture. The notice shall include an advisement that:

The person has the right to attend the hearing required by subsection (c) of this section, but shall not have the right to present evidence or cross examine any witness;

The person will be given at least fifteen (15) days’ notice of the time, date and location of the hearing; and

The purpose of the hearing is for a court to determine whether there was probable cause to believe that the property was used or was intended to be used in violation of this act.

If the commissioner determines there is no probable cause to seize the identified property, he shall not authorize the seizure of any property based upon that event or occurrence and the officer shall not seize any property.

Within thirty (30) days of the seizure, a probable cause hearing shall be held in circuit court, in the county where the property was seized to determine whether probable cause existed to seize the property pursuant to paragraph (b)(iii) of this section. One (1) or more of the law enforcement officers who made the seizure shall testify under oath regarding the facts and circumstances which established probable cause to seize the property. The hearing shall be recorded by sound, sound-and-visual or stenographic means. If the court determines, based upon the evidence presented, that at the time of the seizure:

Probable cause did not exist to seize the property, the court shall order the property to be immediately returned to its lawful owner or one (1) of the persons from whom it was seized; or

Probable cause existed to seize the property, the court shall order that the commissioner may file an action for the forfeiture of the property.

In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, no action for the forfeiture of property pursuant to this section shall be instituted unless it is brought within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of seizure or within thirty (30) days following the completion of any criminal prosecution relating to the seizure, whichever is later. All forfeiture proceedings or actions shall be brought by the commissioner.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be subject to replevin, but is deemed to be in the custody of the commissioner subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over the proceedings. When property is seized under this act, the commissioner shall place the property under seal or otherwise assure the property is maintained under conditions reasonably necessary to preserve the property’s value or may sell the property and hold the proceeds thereof if the property is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in value until the forfeiture proceedings have become final as to all parties and all rights of appeal have been exhausted. In order to preserve the property, if cash, the commissioner may deposit funds into a demand deposit account at an institution located within the state of Wyoming.

Before a forfeiture action may be filed and no later than thirty (30) days from the date of entry of an order finding probable cause pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner shall serve a notice of seizure and intended forfeiture upon any third party, ascertained after reasonably diligent inquiry, known to have an interest in the property. The notice shall describe the date and location of the seizure, the property seized and the statutory basis for the forfeiture. The notice shall be served in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure except that service by publication shall not be required. The notice requirements of this subsection shall not apply to the party or parties from whom the property was directly seized.

A court shall not issue any forfeiture order unless the notice under subsection (f) of this section has been accomplished to the satisfaction of the court.

After the commissioner is authorized by the court or by this section to file a forfeiture action, the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern the action unless in conflict with subsections (j) through (n) of this section.

The complaint to seek forfeiture of property under this section shall describe with reasonable particularity:

The approximate value of the property;

The facts giving rise to the seizure or custody;

The name and position of the person making the seizure or taking the property into custody;

The name and address of the owners of the property or those persons who were in possession of the property at the time of the seizure; and

The manner in which all parties reasonably known to have an interest in the property seized were served in accordance with subsection (f) of this section.

In the action for the forfeiture of property, the burden of proof shall be on the commissioner to establish by clear and convincing evidence the extent to which, if any, the property is subject to forfeiture.

Subsequent to the commissioner carrying his burden of proof pursuant to subsection (k) of this section, an interest in property belonging to a third party shall not be forfeited to the extent the third party establishes he has a perfected lien in the property, proves by a preponderance of evidence that he has a perfected priority interest in the property or that he is an innocent owner. For purposes of this subsection:

With respect to a property interest in existence at the time the violation of this act took place, “innocent owner” means a person who held an interest in the property and neither had knowledge of nor consented to the violation;

With respect to a property interest acquired after the violation of this act has taken place, “innocent owner” means a person who, at the time that person acquired the interest in the property:

Was a bona fide purchaser or seller for value of goods or services or a holder of a bona fide security interest; and

Did not know and was reasonably without cause to believe the property was subject to forfeiture.

The right to trial by jury applies to forfeiture proceedings under this section.

A person’s interest in property is not subject to forfeiture to the extent that the forfeiture is grossly disproportionate to the gravity of the offense giving rise to the forfeiture. The commissioner shall have the burden of demonstrating by a preponderance of the evidence that a forfeiture is not grossly disproportionate. Proportionality shall be decided by the court as follows:

In determining whether a forfeiture is grossly disproportionate, the court shall consider:

The extent to which the property was used or intended to be used in executing the underlying offense;

The value of the property, including both its fair market and subjective value;

The actions of the person involved in the activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings;

The severity of the criminal sanctions associated with the actions of the person;

Whether the property constitutes the person’s lawful livelihood or means of earning a living;

Whether the offense or attempted offense has severe collateral consequences; and

Any other factors the court deems necessary and relevant.

If the court finds the forfeiture is grossly disproportionate to the offense, it shall reduce or eliminate the forfeiture as it finds appropriate.

In any forfeiture proceeding under this section, the court shall award a prevailing property owner reasonable:

Attorney fees and costs; and

Damages.

The proceedings and judgment of forfeiture shall be in rem and shall be against the property itself.

When property is forfeited under this act, the commissioner may:

Retain it for official use; in which case it shall become the property of the state of Wyoming;

Sell any such property which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public. The proceeds shall be used for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising and court costs;

Require the board to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law;

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 160, § 2.

Transfer ownership and control of the property to any municipality or political subdivision of the state for its official use; or

Authorize any law enforcement officer to apply to the district court with jurisdiction for an order providing for destruction of the contraband controlled substances or paraphernalia if no longer necessary for evidentiary purposes, provided, however, that a district court order shall not be necessary for the division of criminal investigation to destroy quantities of contraband controlled substances after the division has tested random samples. The division of criminal investigation shall adopt rules necessary to operate a program to destroy bulk quantities of contraband controlled substances, which shall include:

The photographing and videotaping of the entire bulk amount of seized contraband controlled substances to maintain its evidentiary value and to create exhibits for use in legal proceedings;

The extraction of ten (10) random samples from the entire bulk amount of seized contraband controlled substances for laboratory analysis;

A weighing on properly calibrated scales of both the bulk amount of seized contraband controlled substances and the representative samples;

The additional retention of:

Five (5) ounces of organic material if the controlled substance is marihuana or a substance of similar organic composition;

Five (5) grams of a controlled substance in powdered or crystalline form;

Five-tenths (0.5) of a gram of a controlled substance in liquid form;

An amount sufficient for testing by experts shall be made available from the additionally retained sample for the purpose of defending criminal charges arising from the possession, use or sale of the controlled substance.

After the testing and retention of samples specified in this paragraph, the commissioner or his designee may order the destruction of the bulk amount of the seized contraband controlled substance in excess of the representative sample and the additional retained samples of the seized contraband controlled substance;

Once the representative samples and the additional retained samples of the contraband controlled substance are no longer necessary for evidentiary purposes, any law enforcement officer, upon authorization from the commissioner, may apply to the district court with jurisdiction for an order providing for the destruction of the remaining contraband controlled substance.

Any controlled substance listed in Schedules I through V that is possessed, transferred, sold or offered for sale in violation of this act is contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. Any controlled substance listed in Schedules I through V which is seized or comes into possession of the state and the owner is unknown, is contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state.

Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II may be derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this act, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.

The failure, upon demand by the commissioner, or his authorized agent, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate registration, or proof that he is the holder thereof, constitutes authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

Any law enforcement agency of this state may accept, receive, dispose of and expend the property or proceeds from any property forfeited to the federal government or any state and allocated to the agency by the United States attorney general pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 881(e) or any law of another state. The property or proceeds shall be in addition to funds appropriated to the law enforcement agency by the state legislature or any unit of local government. The property or proceeds may be credited to any lawfully created fund or account designated to receive proceeds of forfeitures.

Any law enforcement agency of this state which receives property or proceeds pursuant to subsection (w) of this section shall report to the attorney general on forms to be prescribed by the attorney general:

The receipt of property or proceeds within thirty (30) days from the receipt; and

The disposition or expenditure of any property or proceeds within ninety (90) days from the disposition or expenditure.

The attorney general shall submit an annual report to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint judiciary interim committee not later than August 1 concerning recipients and the amount of property and proceeds accepted, received, disposed of or expended during the prior calendar year under this section by law enforcement agencies, other than property subject to summary forfeiture.

Any document obtained by a law enforcement officer purporting to waive a person’s interest in or right to property seized under this section is null and void; and

Nothing in this subsection prohibits the commissioner, after a hearing and a finding of probable cause as required by subsection (c) of this section, from requesting a person to waive the person’s interest in or rights to property.

No law enforcement agency of this state shall accept property or proceeds pursuant to subsection (w) of this section if the tender of the property or proceeds is conditioned upon the state law enforcement agency’s adoption of federal law enforcement practices and procedure.

A law enforcement officer may not request, require or in any manner induce any person to execute a document purporting to waive, for purpose of forfeiture under this section, the person’s interest in or rights to property seized, and provided:

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 49; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.49; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1977, ch. 93, § 1; 1982, ch. 46, § 2; 1983, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 188, § 1; 1996, ch. 1, § 313; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 52, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, § 101; 2016 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (j), inserted “or account” in the third sentence and substituted “interim committee” for “committee” in the fourth.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (e), added the proviso in the introductory language of (vi), and added (A) through (F).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted the former last sentence in (j), which read: “For the period beginning July 1, 1996, and ending June 30, 1998, the division shall provide to the joint appropriations interim committee of the legislature a quarterly audit of the assets forfeiture account detailing the collection and distribution of all seized assets.”

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote the section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (bb).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 1, § 2 states as follows: “This act shall apply to seizures of property which occur on or after July 1, 2016 and to any forfeitures proceedings related to property seized on or after July 1, 2016.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, directs: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

State's right to seizure and forfeiture conditional. —

If subsection (b) is to be given any meaningful effect, it must be read to condition the state's right to forfeiture. Furthermore, the conditions which the legislature has statutorily imposed upon the seizure of property must exist at the time law enforcement officers make the seizure. State v. Eleven Thousand Three Hundred Forty-Six Dollars & No Cents in United States Currency, 777 P.2d 65,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1989).

No reimbursement through forfeiture. —

District court erred in ordering reimbursement of public defender's office to be partially paid from forfeiture of defendant's truck, since relevant statutes did not authorize such an action. Mitchell v. State, 982 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1999).

Jurisdiction. —

Based on the forfeiture statute’s plain language, the Court was unable to find a legislative intent to give district courts exclusive jurisdiction over forfeiture actions. Orosco v. Wyoming (In re United States Currency Totaling $14,245.00), 2022 WY 15, 503 P.3d 51,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2022).

Quoted

in

United States v. Corral-Corral, 702 F. Supp. 1539, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14803 (D. Wyo. 1988); DCI. Merkison v. State, 996 P.2d 1138,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2000).

Stated

in

Wise v. State, 654 P.2d 116,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Odor of narcotics as providing probable cause for warrantless search, 5 ALR4th 681.

Forfeiture of money to state or local authorities based on its association with or proximity to other contraband, 38 ALR4th 496.

Necessity of conviction of offense associated with property seized in order to support forfeiture of property to state or local authorities, 38 ALR4th 515.

Forfeitability of property held in marital estate under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute, 84 ALR4th 620.

Validity and construction of provisions of Uniform Controlled Substances Act providing for forfeiture hearing before law enforcement officer, 84 ALR4th 637.

Real property as subject of forfeiture under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statutes, 86 ALR4th 995.

Timeliness of institution of proceedings for forfeiture under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute, 90 ALR4th 493.

Effect of forfeiture proceedings under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute on lien against property subject to forfeiture, 1 ALR5th 317.

Forfeitability of property, under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute, where property or evidence supporting forfeiture was illegally seized, 1 ALR5th 346.

Application of forfeiture provisions of Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute where drugs were possessed for personal use, 1 ALR5th 375.

Forfeitability of property under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute where amount of controlled substance seized is small, 6 ALR5th 652.

Delay in setting hearing date or in holding hearing as affecting forfeitability under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute, 6 ALR5th 711.

Forfeiture of homestead based on criminal activity conducted on premises—state cases, 16 ALR5th 855.

Sufficiency of random sampling of drug or contraband to establish jurisdictional amount required for conviction, 45 ALR5th 1.

Evidence considered in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law-Proximity of asset to drugs, paraphernalia, or records, 115 ALR5th 403.

Evidence considered in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law-Odor of drugs, 116 ALR5th 325.

Forfeiture of personal property used in illegal manufacture, processing, or sale of controlled substances under § 511 of Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 USC § 881), 59 ALR Fed 765, 109 ALR Fed 322, 110 ALR Fed 569, 112 ALR Fed 589.

Delay between seizure of personal property by federal government and institution of proceedings for forfeiture thereof as violative of fifth amendment due process requirements, 69 ALR Fed 373.

Validity, construction and application of criminal forfeiture provisions of Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 USC § 853), 88 ALR Fed 189.

Seizure or forfeiture of real property used in illegal possession, manufacture, processing, purchase or sale of controlled substances under § 511(a)(7) of Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 USC § 881(a)(7)), 104 ALR Fed 288.

Who is exempt from forfeiture of drug proceeds under “innocent owner” provision of 21 USC § 881(a)(6), 109 ALR Fed 322.

Right of mortgagee and/or lienor to compensation when property subject to mortgage and/or lien is taken by federal governmental forfeiture based on criminal acts of owner, 136 ALR Fed 593.

§ 35-7-1050.
Burden of proof; liability of officers.

It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in this act in any complaint, information, indictment, or other pleading or in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this act. The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

In the absence of proof that a person is the authorized holder of an appropriate registration or order form issued under this act, he is presumed not to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon him to rebut the presumption.

No liability is imposed by this act upon any authorized state, county, or municipal officer engaged in the lawful performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 50; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.50.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Burden of proof for exception. —

Because the burden to establish an exception under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act is on the person claiming the exception, defendant, who claimed to have possessed hemp, which is not a controlled substance, bore the burden of establishing that the substance was hemp, defined as cannabis with a tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than 0.3 percent. Thus, sufficient evidence supported defendant’s conviction for possession of marijuana without evidence of THC concentration. Roman v. State, 2022 WY 48, 507 P.3d 453,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2022).

Possession of controlled substance. —

In a prosecution for possession of a controlled substance in violation of §

35-7-1031

, it is not necessary for the state to prove that the defendant did not have a prescription justifying lawful possession; the burden of that exception is on the defendant. Pool v. State, 2001 WY 8, 17 P.3d 1285,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Dover v. State, 664 P.2d 536,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1983); Shumaker v. State, 2007 WY 143, 167 P.3d 11,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Sept. 7, 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Burden of proof and presumptions in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law, 104 ALR5th 229.

Evidence considered in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law—Explanation or lack thereof, 4 ALR6th 113.

§ 35-7-1051.
Review of decisions of board or commissioner.

All final administrative determinations, findings and conclusions of the board or commissioner under this act are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved. Any person aggrieved by the decision may obtain review of such decision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]. Findings of fact by the board or commissioner, if supported by substantial evidence, are conclusive.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 51; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.51.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12 W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1052.
Educational programs; research.

The commissioner may carry out educational programs designed to prevent and deter misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with these programs he may:

Promote better recognition of the problems of misuse and abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations;

Assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

Consult with interested groups and organizations to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems;

Evaluate procedures, projects, techniques, and controls conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

Disseminate the results of research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of what problems exist and what can be done to combat them; and,

Assist in the education and training of state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to control misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

The commissioner may encourage research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with the research, and in furtherance of the enforcement of this act, he may:

Establish methods to assess accurately the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse;

Make studies and undertake programs of research to:

Develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment, and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this act;

Determine patterns of misuse and abuse of controlled substances and the social effects thereof; and,

Improve methods for preventing, predicting, understanding, and dealing with the misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Enter into contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals for the purpose of conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on misuse of controlled substances.

The commissioner may enter into contracts for educational and research activities without performance bonds.

The commissioner shall authorize persons engaged in research on the use and effects of controlled substances to withhold the names and other identifying characteristics of individuals who are the subjects of the research. Persons who obtain this authorization are not compelled in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding to identify the individuals who are the subjects of research for which the authorization was obtained.

The commissioner may authorize the possession and distribution of controlled substances by persons engaged in research. Persons who obtain this authorization are exempt from state prosecution for possession and distribution of controlled substances to the extent of the authorization.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 52; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.52.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Article VII

§ 35-7-1053.
Miscellaneous provisions.

Prosecution for any violation of law occurring prior to the effective date of this act is not affected or abated by this act. If the offense being prosecuted is similar to one set out in Article V of this act, the penalties under Article V apply if they are less than those under prior law.

Civil seizures or forfeitures and injunctive proceedings commenced prior to the effective date of this act are not affected by this act.

All administrative proceedings pending under prior laws which are superseded by this act shall be continued and brought to a final determination in accord with the laws and rules in effect prior to the effective date of the act. Any substance controlled under prior law which is not listed within Schedules I through V is automatically controlled without further proceedings and shall be listed in the appropriate schedule.

The board shall initially permit persons to register who own or operate any establishment engaged in the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of any controlled substance prior to the effective date of this act and who are registered or licensed by the state.

This act applies to violations of law, seizures and forfeiture, injunctive proceedings, administrative proceedings and investigations which occur following its effective date.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 53; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.53.

Editor's notes. —

Section 57, ch. 246, Laws 1971, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved March 4, 1971.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Under what circumstances should total weight of mixture or substance in which detectable amount of controlled substance is incorporated be used in assessing sentence under United States Sentencing Guideline § 2D1.1—post-Chapman cases, 113 ALR Fed 91.

§ 35-7-1054.
Existing orders and rules.

Any orders and rules promulgated under any law affected by this act and in effect on the effective date of this act and not in conflict with it continue in effect until modified, superseded, or repealed.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 54; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.54.

Editor's notes. —

Section 57, ch. 246, Laws 1971, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved March 4, 1971.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1055.
Construction.

This act shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among those states which enact similar legislation.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 55; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.55.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Severability. —

Section 56, ch. 246, Laws 1971, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Article VIII

§ 35-7-1056.
Delivery of, or possession with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia.

It is unlawful for any person to deliver, or possess with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 46, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under federal constitution, of so-called “head shop” ordinances or statutes, prohibiting manufacture and sale of drug use related paraphernalia, 69 ALR Fed 15.

Construction and Application of State Drug Paraphernalia Acts. 23 A.L.R.6th 307.

§ 35-7-1057.
Delivery of drug paraphernalia to a minor.

Any adult who violates W.S.

35-7-1056

by delivering drug paraphernalia to a minor is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 46, § 1.

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and Application of State Drug Paraphernalia Acts. 23 A.L.R.6th 307.

Article IX